North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 1. Apportionment of Members; Compensation and Allowances.
§ 120-2.
House apportionment specified.

For the purpose of nominating and electing members of the North Carolina House of Representatives in 2022 and periodically thereafter, the State of North Carolina shall be divided into the following districts with each district electing one Representative:

District 1: Chowan County, Currituck County, Dare County: VTD DUCK, VTD KDH: Block(s) 0559702001005, 0559702001006, 0559702001007, 0559702001008, 0559702001009, 0559702001010, 0559702001011, 0559702001012, 0559702001013, 0559702001014, 0559702001015, 0559702001016, 0559702001017, 0559702001018, 0559702001019, 0559702001020, 0559702001021, 0559702001022, 0559702001023, 0559702001024, 0559702001025, 0559702001026, 0559702001027, 0559702001028, 0559702001029, 0559702001030, 0559702001031, 0559702001032, 0559702001033, 0559702001034, 0559702001035, 0559702001036, 0559702001037, 0559702001038, 0559702001039, 0559702001040, 0559702001041, 0559702001042, 0559702001043, 0559702001044, 0559702001045, 0559702001046, 0559702001047, 0559702001048, 0559702001049, 0559702001050, 0559702001051, 0559702001052, 0559702001053, 0559702001054, 0559702001055, 0559702001056, 0559702001057, 0559702001058, 0559702002002, 0559702002003, 0559702002004, 0559702002005, 0559702002006, 0559702002007, 0559702002008, 0559702002009, 0559702002010, 0559702002011, 0559702002012, 0559702002016, 0559702002017, 0559702002018, 0559702002019, 0559702002020, 0559702002021, 0559702002022, 0559702002023, 0559702002024, 0559702002025, 0559702002026, 0559702002027, 0559702002028, 0559702002029, 0559702002030, 0559702002031, 0559702002032, 0559702002033, 0559702002034, 0559702002035, 0559702002036, 0559702002037, 0559702002038, 0559702002039, 0559702002040, 0559702002041, 0559702002042, 0559702002043, 0559702002044, 0559702003000, 0559702003001, 0559702003002, 0559702003003, 0559702003004, 0559702003006, 0559702003007, 0559702003008, 0559702003009, 0559702003010, 0559702003011, 0559702003012, 0559702003013, 0559702003014, 0559702003015, 0559702003016, 0559702003017, 0559702003018, 0559702003019, 0559702003020, 0559702003021, 0559702003022, 0559702003023, 0559702003024, 0559702004000, 0559702004001, 0559702004002, 0559702004003, 0559702004004, 0559702004005, 0559702004006, 0559702004007, 0559702004008, 0559702004009, 0559702004010, 0559702004011, 0559702004012, 0559702004013, 0559702004016, 0559702004017, 0559702004018, 0559702004019, 0559702004020, 0559702004021, 0559702004022, 0559702004023, 0559703021000, 0559703021001, 0559703021002, 0559703021003, 0559703021004, 0559703021005, 0559703021006, 0559703021007, 0559703021008, 0559703021009, 0559703021010, 0559703021011, 0559703021012, 0559703021031, 0559703021033, 0559703021034, 0559703021035, 0559703021036, 0559703021037, 0559703021038, 0559703021039, 0559703021040, 0559703021041, 0559703021042, 0559703021043, 0559703021044, 0559703021045, 0559703021046, 0559703021047, 0559703021048, 0559703021049, 0559703021050, 0559703021051, 0559703021052, 0559703021053, 0559703021054, 0559703021055, 0559703021056, 0559703021057, 0559703021058, 0559703021059, 0559703021060, 0559703021061, 0559703021062, 0559703021063, 0559703021064, 0559703021065, 0559703021066, 0559703021067, 0559703021072, 0559703021073, 0559703021074, 0559703021075, 0559703022000, 0559703022001, 0559703022002, 0559703022003, 0559703022004, 0559703022005, 0559703022006, 0559703022007, 0559703022008, 0559703022009, 0559703022010, 0559703022011, 0559703022012, 0559703022013, 0559703022014, 0559703022015, 0559703022016, 0559703022017, 0559703022018, 0559703022019, 0559703022020, 0559703022021, 0559703022022, 0559703022023, 0559703022024, 0559703022025, 0559703022026, 0559703022027, 0559703022028, 0559703022029, 0559703022030, 0559703022031, 0559703022032, 0559703022033, 0559703022034, 0559703022035, 0559703022036, 0559703022037, 0559703022038, 0559703022039, 0559703022040, 0559703022041, 0559703022042, 0559703022043, 0559703022044, 0559703022045, 0559703022046, 0559703022047, 0559703022048, 0559703022049, 0559703022050, 0559703022051, 0559703022052, 0559703022053, 0559703022054, 0559703022055, 0559703022056, 0559703022057, 0559703022058, 0559703022059, 0559703022060, 0559703022061, 0559703022062, 0559703022063, 0559703022064, 0559703022065, 0559703022066, 0559703022067, 0559703022068, 0559703022069, 0559901000005; VTD KTHK, VTD SOSH; Perquimans County, Tyrrell County, Washington County.

District 2: Durham County: VTD 023, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 044, VTD 045, VTD 046; Person County.

District 3: Craven County: VTD 002: Block(s) 0499611012002, 0499611012019, 0499611012020, 0499611012021, 0499611012022, 0499611012023, 0499611012024, 0499611012025, 0499611012026, 0499611012027, 0499611012028, 0499611012029, 0499611012030, 0499611012031, 0499611012032, 0499611012033, 0499611012034, 0499611012035, 0499611012036, 0499611012037, 0499611021000, 0499611021002, 0499611021003, 0499611021006, 0499611021007, 0499611021008, 0499611021009, 0499611021015, 0499611021016, 0499611021017, 0499611021018, 0499611021019, 0499611021020, 0499611021021, 0499611021022, 0499611021023, 0499611021024, 0499611021026, 0499611022013, 0499611022014, 0499611022015, 0499611022016, 0499611022017, 0499611022018, 0499611022020, 0499611022044, 0499611022045, 0499611022074, 0499612011000, 0499612011001, 0499612011002, 0499612011003, 0499612011004, 0499612011005, 0499612011006, 0499612011007, 0499612011008, 0499612011009, 0499612011010, 0499612011011, 0499612011012, 0499612011013, 0499612011014, 0499612011015, 0499612011016, 0499612011017, 0499612011018, 0499612011019, 0499612011020, 0499612011021, 0499612011022, 0499612011023, 0499612011024, 0499612011025, 0499612011026, 0499612011027, 0499612011028, 0499612011029, 0499612011030, 0499612011031, 0499612011032, 0499612011033, 0499612011034, 0499612011035, 0499612011036, 0499612011037, 0499612011038, 0499612011039, 0499612011040, 0499612011041, 0499612011042, 0499612011043, 0499612011044, 0499612011045, 0499612012000, 0499612012001, 0499612012002, 0499612012003, 0499612012004, 0499612012005, 0499612012006, 0499612012007, 0499612012008, 0499612012009, 0499612012010, 0499612012011, 0499612012012, 0499612012013, 0499612012014, 0499612012015, 0499612012016, 0499612012017, 0499612012018, 0499612012019, 0499612012020, 0499612012021, 0499612012022, 0499612012023, 0499612012024, 0499612012037, 0499612013000, 0499612013001, 0499612013002, 0499612013003, 0499612013004, 0499612013005, 0499612013006, 0499612013007, 0499612013008, 0499612013009, 0499612013010, 0499612013011, 0499612013012, 0499612013013, 0499612013014, 0499612013015, 0499612013016, 0499612013017, 0499612013018, 0499612013019, 0499612013020, 0499612013021, 0499612021000, 0499612021001, 0499612021002, 0499612021003, 0499612021004, 0499612021005, 0499612021006, 0499612021007, 0499612021008, 0499612021009, 0499612021010, 0499612021011, 0499612021012, 0499612021013, 0499612021014, 0499612021015, 0499612021016, 0499612021017, 0499612021018, 0499612021019, 0499612021020, 0499612021021, 0499612021022, 0499612021023, 0499612021024, 0499612021025, 0499612021026, 0499612021027, 0499612021028, 0499612021029, 0499612021030, 0499612021031, 0499612021032, 0499612021033, 0499612021034, 0499612021035, 0499612021036, 0499612021037, 0499612021038, 0499612021039, 0499612021040, 0499612021041, 0499612021042, 0499612021043, 0499612021044, 0499612021045, 0499612021046, 0499612021047, 0499612021048, 0499612021049, 0499612021050, 0499612021051, 0499612021052, 0499612021053, 0499612021054, 0499612021055, 0499612021056, 0499612021057, 0499612021058, 0499612021059, 0499612021060, 0499612021061, 0499612021062, 0499612021063, 0499612021064, 0499612021065, 0499612021066, 0499612021067, 0499612021068, 0499612021069, 0499612021070, 0499612021071, 0499612021072, 0499612021073, 0499612021074, 0499612021075, 0499612021076, 0499612021077, 0499612021078, 0499612021080, 0499612021081, 0499612021082, 0499612021083, 0499612021084, 0499612021085, 0499612021086, 0499612021087, 0499612021088, 0499612021089, 0499612021090, 0499612021095, 0499612021099, 0499612021100, 0499612021101, 0499612021103, 0499612021104, 0499612021105, 0499613013000, 0499613032046; VTD 003, VTD 005, VTD 007, VTD 011, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 023, VTD CFB8, VTD CLR4, VTD DFB9, VTD N1, VTD N2, VTD N3N5, VTD N4, VTD N6, VTD TE13, VTD VE14.

District 4: Duplin County, Wayne County: VTD 014, VTD 015: Block(s) 1910004011018, 1910004011019, 1910004011020, 1910004011021, 1910004011022, 1910004011023, 1910004011024, 1910004011025, 1910004013000, 1910004013001, 1910004013002, 1910004013003, 1910004013004, 1910004013005, 1910004013006, 1910004013007, 1910004013008, 1910004013009, 1910004013010, 1910004013011, 1910004013012, 1910004013013, 1910004013014, 1910004013015, 1910004013016, 1910004013017, 1910004013018, 1910004013019, 1910004013020, 1910004013021, 1910004013022, 1910004013023, 1910004013024, 1910004014011, 1910004014013, 1910004023000, 1910004023001, 1910004023002, 1910004023003, 1910004023004, 1910004023005, 1910004023006, 1910004023007, 1910004023008, 1910004023009, 1910004023010, 1910004023011, 1910004023012, 1910004023013, 1910004023014, 1910004023015, 1910004023017, 1910004023018, 1910004023024, 1910006032004, 1910006041000, 1910006041001, 1910006041002, 1910006041003, 1910006041004, 1910006041005, 1910006041006, 1910006041007, 1910006041008, 1910006041009, 1910006041010, 1910006041011, 1910006041012, 1910006041013, 1910006041014, 1910006041015, 1910006041016, 1910006041017, 1910006041018, 1910006041019, 1910006041020, 1910006041021, 1910006041022, 1910006041023, 1910006042000, 1910006042001, 1910006042002, 1910006042008, 1910006042009, 1910006043000, 1910006043001, 1910006043002, 1910006043003, 1910006043004, 1910006043005, 1910006043006, 1910006043007, 1910006043008, 1910006043009, 1910006043010, 1910006043011, 1910006043012, 1910006043013, 1910006043014, 1910006043015, 1910006043016, 1910006043017, 1910006043018, 1910006043019, 1910006043020, 1910006043021, 1910006043022, 1910006043023, 1910006043024, 1910006043025, 1910006043026, 1910006043027, 1910006043028, 1910006043029, 1910006043030, 1910006043031, 1910006043032, 1910006043033, 1910006043034, 1910006043035, 1910006043036, 1910006043037, 1910006043038, 1910006043039, 1910006043040, 1910006043041; VTD 016: Block(s) 1910009012000, 1910009012001, 1910009012002, 1910009012003, 1910009012004, 1910009012005, 1910009012006, 1910009012007, 1910009013000, 1910009013001, 1910009013002, 1910009013003, 1910009013004, 1910009013005, 1910009013006, 1910009013007, 1910009013017, 1910009021005, 1910009021006, 1910009021007, 1910009021008, 1910009022008, 1910009022009, 1910009022010, 1910009022011, 1910009023000, 1910009023001, 1910009023002, 1910009023003, 1910009023004, 1910009023005, 1910009023006, 1910009023007, 1910009023008, 1910009023009, 1910009023010, 1910009023011, 1910009023012, 1910009023014, 1910009023017, 1910009023018, 1910009023029, 1910009023030, 1910009023031, 1910009023032, 1910009023033, 1910009023034, 1910009023039, 1910009023041; VTD 024, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 028, VTD 2530.

District 5: Camden County, Gates County, Hertford County, Pasquotank County.

District 6: Harnett County: VTD PR01, VTD PR07, VTD PR16, VTD PR20, VTD PR23, VTD PR31, VTD PR32.

District 7: Franklin County, Granville County: VTD CRDM: Block(s) 0779706011043, 0779706061006, 0779706061007, 0779706061008, 0779706061009, 0779706061010, 0779706061011, 0779706061013, 0779706061014, 0779706061015, 0779706061017, 0779706061018, 0779706061019, 0779706061020, 0779706061021, 0779706061023, 0779706061024, 0779706061025, 0779706061026, 0779706061027, 0779706061028, 0779706061029, 0779706061030, 0779706061035, 0779706061036, 0779706061037, 0779706061039, 0779706061040, 0779706061041, 0779706061042, 0779706062002, 0779706062003, 0779706062004, 0779706062005, 0779706062006, 0779706062007, 0779706062008, 0779706062009, 0779706062010, 0779706062011, 0779706062012, 0779706062013, 0779706062014, 0779706062015, 0779706062016, 0779706062017, 0779706062018, 0779706062019, 0779706062020, 0779706062021, 0779706062023, 0779706062030, 0779706062031, 0779706062032, 0779706071000, 0779706071001, 0779706071002, 0779706071003, 0779706071004, 0779706071005, 0779706071006, 0779706071007, 0779706071008, 0779706071009, 0779706071010, 0779706071011, 0779706071012, 0779706071013, 0779706071015, 0779706071016, 0779706071018, 0779706071019, 0779706072009, 0779706072010, 0779706072012, 0779706072013, 0779706072014, 0779706072015; VTD MTEN, VTD WILT.

District 8: Pitt County: VTD 101, VTD 1101, VTD 1102A, VTD 1102B, VTD 1201, VTD 1501, VTD 1503, VTD 1504A, VTD 1504B, VTD 1506, VTD 1507, VTD 1507B, VTD 1508A, VTD 1508B, VTD 1509, VTD 301, VTD 401, VTD 501, VTD 701, VTD 800A, VTD 800B, VTD 901.

District 9: Pitt County: VTD 1001, VTD 1301, VTD 1403A1, VTD 1403A2, VTD 1403B, VTD 1505A, VTD 1505B, VTD 1510A, VTD 1510B, VTD 1511A, VTD 1511B, VTD 1512A, VTD 1512B, VTD 1513A, VTD 1513B, VTD 200A, VTD 200B, VTD 601.

District 10: Wayne County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 015: Block(s) 1910003022018, 1910003022019, 1910003022020, 1910003022021, 1910003022022, 1910003022025, 1910003022026, 1910003022027, 1910003022028, 1910003022029, 1910003022030, 1910003022031, 1910003022032, 1910003022036, 1910003022037, 1910003022040, 1910003022041, 1910003022042, 1910003022046, 1910004011009, 1910004011010, 1910004011011, 1910004011012, 1910004011013, 1910004011014, 1910004011015, 1910004011016, 1910004011017; VTD 016: Block(s) 1910009011000, 1910009011001, 1910009011002, 1910009011003, 1910009011004, 1910009011005, 1910009011006, 1910009011007, 1910009011008, 1910009011009, 1910009011010, 1910009011011, 1910009011012, 1910009011013, 1910009011014, 1910009011015, 1910009011016, 1910009011017, 1910009011018, 1910009011019, 1910009011020, 1910009011045, 1910009013008, 1910009013009, 1910009013010, 1910009013011, 1910009013012, 1910009013013, 1910009013014, 1910009013015, 1910009013016, 1910009013018, 1910009013019, 1910009013020, 1910009013021, 1910009013022, 1910009013023, 1910009013024, 1910009013025, 1910009013026, 1910009013027, 1910009013028; VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 029, VTD 1920.

District 11: Wake County: VTD 01-01, VTD 01-23, VTD 01-31, VTD 01-32, VTD 01-41, VTD 01-48, VTD 06-07, VTD 18-01, VTD 18-02, VTD 18-04, VTD 18-05, VTD 18-06, VTD 18-08.

District 12: Greene County, Jones County, Lenoir County.

District 13: Carteret County, Craven County: VTD 002: Block(s) 0499611021001, 0499611021004, 0499611021005, 0499611021010, 0499611021011, 0499611021012, 0499611021013, 0499611021014, 0499611021025, 0499611021027, 0499611022023, 0499611022024, 0499611022025, 0499611022026, 0499611022027, 0499611022029, 0499611022030, 0499611022031, 0499611022032, 0499611022033, 0499611022035, 0499611022036, 0499611022037, 0499611022038, 0499611022041, 0499611022042, 0499611022043, 0499611022046, 0499611022047, 0499611022048, 0499611022049, 0499611022051, 0499611022052, 0499611022053, 0499611022054, 0499611022055, 0499611022056, 0499611022057, 0499611022058, 0499611022059, 0499611022060, 0499611022061, 0499611022062, 0499611022063, 0499611022064, 0499611022065, 0499611022066, 0499611022067, 0499611022068, 0499611022069, 0499611022070, 0499611022071, 0499611022072, 0499611022073, 0499611022075, 0499611022076, 0499611022077, 0499611022078, 0499611022079, 0499611022080, 0499611022081, 0499611022082, 0499611022083, 0499611022084, 0499611022085, 0499611022086, 0499611022087, 0499611022088, 0499611022089, 0499612012025, 0499612012026, 0499612012027, 0499612012028, 0499612012029, 0499612012030, 0499612012031, 0499612012032, 0499612012033, 0499612012034, 0499612012035, 0499612012036, 0499612012038, 0499612012039, 0499612012040, 0499612012041, 0499612012042, 0499612012043, 0499612021079, 0499612021091, 0499612021092, 0499612021093, 0499612021094, 0499612021102, 0499613011000, 0499613011001, 0499613011002, 0499613011003, 0499613011004, 0499613011005, 0499613011006, 0499613011007, 0499613011008, 0499613011009, 0499613011010, 0499613011011, 0499613011012, 0499613011013, 0499613011014, 0499613011015, 0499613011016, 0499613011017, 0499613011018, 0499613011019, 0499613011020, 0499613011021, 0499613011022, 0499613011023, 0499613011024, 0499613011025, 0499613012000, 0499613012001, 0499613012002, 0499613012003, 0499613012004, 0499613012005, 0499613012006, 0499613012007, 0499613012008, 0499613012009, 0499613012010, 0499613012011, 0499613012012, 0499613012013, 0499613012014, 0499613012015, 0499613012016, 0499613012017, 0499613012018, 0499613012019, 0499613012020, 0499613012021, 0499613012022, 0499613012023, 0499613012024, 0499613012025, 0499613012026, 0499613012027, 0499613012028, 0499613012029, 0499613012030, 0499613012031, 0499613012032, 0499613012033, 0499613012034, 0499613012035, 0499613012036, 0499613012037, 0499613012038, 0499613012039, 0499613012040, 0499613012041, 0499613012042, 0499613012043, 0499613012044, 0499613012045, 0499613013001, 0499613013002, 0499613013003, 0499613013004, 0499613013005, 0499613013006, 0499613013007, 0499613013008, 0499613013009, 0499613013010, 0499613013011, 0499613013012, 0499613013013, 0499613013014, 0499613013015, 0499613013016, 0499613013017, 0499613013018, 0499613013019, 0499613013020, 0499613013021, 0499613013022, 0499613013023, 0499613013024, 0499613013025, 0499613013026, 0499613013027, 0499613013028, 0499613013029, 0499613013030, 0499613021004, 0499613021005, 0499613021006, 0499613021007, 0499613021008, 0499613021009, 0499613021010, 0499613021011, 0499613021012, 0499613021013, 0499613021014, 0499613021015, 0499613021016, 0499613021017, 0499613021019, 0499613021020, 0499613021021, 0499613021022, 0499613021023, 0499613022000, 0499613022001, 0499613022002, 0499613022003, 0499613022004, 0499613022005, 0499613022006, 0499613022007, 0499613022008, 0499613022009, 0499613022010, 0499613022011, 0499613022012, 0499613022013, 0499613022014, 0499613022015, 0499613022016, 0499613023000, 0499613023001, 0499613023002, 0499613023003, 0499613023004, 0499613023005, 0499613023006, 0499613023007, 0499613023008, 0499613023009, 0499613023010, 0499613023011, 0499613023012, 0499613023013, 0499613023014, 0499613023015, 0499613023016, 0499613023017, 0499613023018, 0499613023019, 0499613032044, 0499613032045; VTD 019.

District 14: Onslow County: VTD BC21, VTD BM08, VTD HU20, VTD JA01, VTD MT24, VTD NE22A, VTD NR02, VTD SW19, VTD VR15.

District 15: Onslow County: VTD CL10, VTD CR07, VTD EN03, VTD GB12, VTD HM05, VTD ML23, VTD NE22B, VTD NM13, VTD RL09, VTD TL06, VTD WN04.

District 16: Onslow County: VTD FS16, VTD HN14, VTD HR17, VTD SF18; Pender County.

District 17: Brunswick County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 005, VTD 011, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 04A, VTD 4B2.

District 18: New Hanover County: VTD CF01, VTD CF02, VTD CF05, VTD CF06, VTD H02, VTD H08, VTD H10, VTD H11, VTD H12, VTD H13, VTD W03, VTD W08, VTD W15, VTD W25, VTD W26, VTD W27, VTD W29.

District 19: Brunswick County: VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 012, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 10A, VTD 10B; New Hanover County: VTD FP03, VTD FP04, VTD FP06, VTD FP07, VTD FP08, VTD M03, VTD W30.

District 20: New Hanover County: VTD H01, VTD H03, VTD H04, VTD H05, VTD H06, VTD M02, VTD M04, VTD M06, VTD M07, VTD W12, VTD W13, VTD W16, VTD W17, VTD W18, VTD W21, VTD W24, VTD W28, VTD W31, VTD WB.

District 21: Wake County: VTD 05-01, VTD 05-03, VTD 05-06, VTD 05-07, VTD 05-08, VTD 20-14, VTD 20-15, VTD 20-16, VTD 20-17.

District 22: Bladen County, Sampson County.

District 23: Bertie County, Edgecombe County, Martin County.

District 24: Nash County: VTD P24A; Wilson County.

District 25: Nash County: VTD P01A, VTD P02A, VTD P03A, VTD P04A, VTD P05A, VTD P06A, VTD P07A, VTD P08A, VTD P09A, VTD P10A, VTD P11A, VTD P12A, VTD P13A, VTD P14A, VTD P15A, VTD P16A, VTD P17A, VTD P18A, VTD P19A, VTD P20A, VTD P21A, VTD P22A, VTD P23A.

District 26: Johnston County: VTD PR09, VTD PR10A, VTD PR10B, VTD PR11A, VTD PR11B, VTD PR12A, VTD PR20, VTD PR21, VTD PR29A, VTD PR29B, VTD PR32, VTD PR34.

District 27: Halifax County, Northampton County, Warren County.

District 28: Johnston County: VTD PR04, VTD PR07, VTD PR08, VTD PR13, VTD PR14, VTD PR19, VTD PR22, VTD PR24, VTD PR25, VTD PR26, VTD PR27A, VTD PR27B, VTD PR28, VTD PR30, VTD PR35, VTD PR36, VTD PR37, VTD PR38.

District 29: Durham County: VTD 009, VTD 016, VTD 027, VTD 036, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 048, VTD 051, VTD 054, VTD 34-1, VTD 34-2, VTD 35.3, VTD 53-1, VTD 53-2.

District 30: Durham County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 017, VTD 019, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 024, VTD 037, VTD 040, VTD 043, VTD 050.

District 31: Durham County: VTD 010, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 018, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 033, VTD 047, VTD 052, VTD 055-11, VTD 055-49, VTD 30-1, VTD 30-2.

District 32: Granville County: VTD ANTI, VTD BERE, VTD BTNR, VTD CORI, VTD CRDL, VTD CRDM: Block(s) 0779706011004, 0779706011005, 0779706011006, 0779706011020, 0779706011024, 0779706011025, 0779706011026, 0779706011027, 0779706011028, 0779706011029, 0779706011030, 0779706011031, 0779706011044, 0779706061000, 0779706061001, 0779706061002, 0779706061003, 0779706061004, 0779706061005, 0779706061012, 0779706061016, 0779706061022, 0779706062022, 0779706062033, 0779706062034, 0779706062035, 0779706062036, 0779706071014, 0779706071017, 0779706071020, 0779706071021, 0779706071022, 0779706071023, 0779706071024, 0779706071025, 0779706071026, 0779706071027, 0779706071028, 0779706071029, 0779706071030, 0779706071031, 0779706071032, 0779706071033, 0779706071034, 0779706071035, 0779706071036, 0779706071037, 0779706072000, 0779706072001, 0779706072002, 0779706072003, 0779706072004, 0779706072005, 0779706072006, 0779706072007, 0779706072008, 0779706072011, 0779706072016, 0779706072017, 0779706072018, 0779706072019, 0779706072020, 0779706072021, 0779706072022, 0779706072023, 0779706072024, 0779706072025, 0779706072026, 0779706073000, 0779706073001, 0779706073002, 0779706073003, 0779706073004, 0779706073005, 0779706073006, 0779706073007, 0779706073008, 0779706073009, 0779706073010, 0779706073011, 0779706073012, 0779706073013; VTD EAOX, VTD OKHL, VTD SALM, VTD SASS, VTD SOOX, VTD TYHO, VTD WOEL; Vance County.

District 33: Wake County: VTD 01-22, VTD 15-01, VTD 15-02, VTD 15-03, VTD 15-04, VTD 16-01, VTD 16-02, VTD 16-03, VTD 16-04, VTD 16-05, VTD 16-06, VTD 16-07, VTD 16-09, VTD 16-10, VTD 16-11.

District 34: Wake County: VTD 01-04, VTD 01-05, VTD 01-06, VTD 01-09, VTD 01-10, VTD 01-11, VTD 01-12, VTD 01-15, VTD 01-17, VTD 01-18, VTD 01-30, VTD 01-36, VTD 01-37, VTD 01-39, VTD 01-43, VTD 01-45, VTD 01-51, VTD 02-06, VTD 07-02, VTD 07-03, VTD 07-04, VTD 07-05, VTD 07-06, VTD 07-07, VTD 07-09, VTD 07-11, VTD 07-13.

District 35: Wake County: VTD 19-03, VTD 19-05, VTD 19-07, VTD 19-09, VTD 19-11, VTD 19-12, VTD 19-13, VTD 19-14, VTD 19-15, VTD 19-16, VTD 19-18, VTD 19-19, VTD 19-20, VTD 19-21.

District 36: Wake County: VTD 03-00, VTD 04-07, VTD 06-06, VTD 06-08, VTD 06-09, VTD 20-01, VTD 20-05, VTD 20-06A, VTD 20-06B, VTD 20-09, VTD 20-11, VTD 20-12.

District 37: Wake County: VTD 06-04, VTD 06-05, VTD 06-10, VTD 12-01, VTD 12-02, VTD 12-04, VTD 12-05, VTD 12-06, VTD 12-07, VTD 12-08, VTD 12-09, VTD 18-07.

District 38: Wake County: VTD 01-07, VTD 01-13, VTD 01-14, VTD 01-19, VTD 01-20, VTD 01-21, VTD 01-25, VTD 01-26, VTD 01-27, VTD 01-28, VTD 01-34, VTD 01-35, VTD 01-40, VTD 01-50, VTD 17-01, VTD 17-05, VTD 17-07, VTD 17-09.

District 39: Wake County: VTD 09-01, VTD 09-02, VTD 09-03, VTD 10-01, VTD 10-02, VTD 10-03, VTD 10-04, VTD 17-02, VTD 17-03, VTD 17-04, VTD 17-06, VTD 17-12, VTD 17-13.

District 40: Wake County: VTD 02-01, VTD 02-02, VTD 02-03, VTD 02-04, VTD 02-05, VTD 08-02, VTD 08-03, VTD 08-04, VTD 08-05, VTD 08-06, VTD 08-07, VTD 08-08, VTD 08-09, VTD 08-10, VTD 08-11, VTD 13-10, VTD 13-11, VTD 14-01, VTD 14-02.

District 41: Wake County: VTD 04-01, VTD 04-02, VTD 04-03, VTD 04-04, VTD 04-06, VTD 04-09, VTD 04-10, VTD 04-11, VTD 04-12, VTD 04-13, VTD 04-14, VTD 04-15, VTD 04-16, VTD 04-19, VTD 04-20, VTD 18-03, VTD 20-03, VTD 20-04, VTD 20-08, VTD 20-10.

District 42: Cumberland County: VTD CC27, VTD CL57-1, VTD CL57-2, VTD G11B, VTD G2D, VTD G5A-1, VTD G5A-2, VTD G5B-2, VTD LR63, VTD MB62, VTD MR02, VTD SL78-3.

District 43: Cumberland County: VTD AL51, VTD CC01, VTD CC05, VTD CC19, VTD EO61-1, VTD EO61-2, VTD G1A, VTD G1B, VTD G2A, VTD G2B, VTD G2C-1, VTD G2C-2, VTD G2E-1, VTD G3C, VTD G6A, VTD G6B, VTD G6C, VTD G7A, VTD G7B, VTD LI65, VTD SH77.

District 44: Cumberland County: VTD CC03, VTD CC04, VTD CC06, VTD CC07, VTD CC08, VTD CC10, VTD CC12, VTD CC13, VTD CC14, VTD CC15, VTD CC16, VTD CC17, VTD CC18, VTD CC21, VTD CC24, VTD CC25, VTD CC26, VTD CC29, VTD CC31, VTD CC32, VTD CC33, VTD CC34, VTD CU02, VTD G2E-2, VTD G3B, VTD G4A, VTD G4B, VTD G4C.

District 45: Cumberland County: VTD AH49, VTD G10A, VTD G10B, VTD G10C, VTD G3A-1, VTD G3A-2, VTD G5B-1, VTD G5C, VTD G8A, VTD G8B, VTD G8C, VTD G8D, VTD G9A, VTD G9B-1, VTD G9B-2.

District 46: Columbus County, Robeson County: VTD 003, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 030: Block(s) 1559607011000, 1559607011001, 1559607011002, 1559607011003, 1559607011004, 1559607011005, 1559607011006, 1559607011007, 1559607011008, 1559607011009, 1559607011010, 1559607011011, 1559607011012, 1559607011013, 1559607011014, 1559607011015, 1559607011016, 1559607011017, 1559607011018, 1559607011019, 1559607011020, 1559607011021, 1559607011022, 1559607011023, 1559607011024, 1559607011025, 1559607011026, 1559607011027, 1559607011028, 1559607012000, 1559607012001, 1559607012002, 1559607012003, 1559607012004, 1559607012005, 1559607012006, 1559607012007, 1559607012008, 1559607012009, 1559607012010, 1559607012011, 1559607012012, 1559607012013, 1559607012014, 1559607012015, 1559607012016, 1559607012017, 1559607012018, 1559607012019, 1559607013000, 1559607013001, 1559607013002, 1559607013003, 1559607013004, 1559607013005, 1559607013006, 1559607013007, 1559607013008, 1559607013009, 1559607013010, 1559607013011, 1559607013012, 1559607013013, 1559607013014, 1559607013015, 1559607013016, 1559607013017, 1559607013018, 1559607013019, 1559607013020, 1559607013021, 1559607013022, 1559607013023, 1559607013024, 1559607013025, 1559607013026, 1559607013029, 1559607013030, 1559607013031, 1559607013032, 1559607013033, 1559607013034, 1559607013038, 1559607013051, 1559607013061, 1559607013062, 1559607013063, 1559607013064, 1559607013065, 1559607013066, 1559607013067, 1559607013075, 1559607013076, 1559607013077, 1559613013000, 1559613013001, 1559613013002, 1559613013003, 1559613013004, 1559613013006, 1559613013007, 1559613013008, 1559613013009, 1559613013010, 1559613013011, 1559613013012, 1559613013013, 1559613013015, 1559613013016, 1559613013017, 1559613013019, 1559613013020, 1559613013021, 1559613013022, 1559614002036, 1559614002037, 1559614002038, 1559614002039, 1559614002040, 1559614002041, 1559614002042, 1559614002055, 1559614002056, 1559614002057; VTD 037, VTD 041, VTD 32A.

District 47: Robeson County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 004, VTD 007, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 019, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 028, VTD 029, VTD 030: Block(s) 1559607013068, 1559607013069, 1559607013070, 1559607013071, 1559607013072, 1559607013073, 1559607013074, 1559607013079, 1559607013080; VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 05A, VTD 11A, VTD 18A, VTD 26A.

District 48: Hoke County, Scotland County.

District 49: Wake County: VTD 01-02, VTD 01-03, VTD 01-16, VTD 01-29, VTD 01-33, VTD 01-49, VTD 04-05, VTD 04-08, VTD 04-17, VTD 04-18, VTD 04-21, VTD 05-05, VTD 07-01, VTD 07-10, VTD 07-12, VTD 11-01, VTD 11-02.

District 50: Caswell County, Orange County: VTD CA, VTD CG, VTD CP, VTD CS1, VTD CW, VTD CX, VTD EF, VTD ENO, VTD GB, VTD H, VTD HE, VTD OG, VTD PA, VTD SJ, VTD SM, VTD TO, VTD WC, VTD WH.

District 51: Lee County, Moore County: VTD CAM, VTD CAR, VTD LTR, VTD VSS.

District 52: Moore County: VTD EAB, VTD EKWD, VTD EUR-WP, VTD EWD, VTD NSP, VTD PBF, VTD PDN, VTD SSP, VTD WAB, VTD WKWD; Richmond County.

District 53: Harnett County: VTD PR08, VTD PR24, VTD PR25, VTD PR26, VTD PR28, VTD PR29; Johnston County: VTD PR12B, VTD PR23A, VTD PR23B, VTD PR31A, VTD PR31B, VTD PR33.

District 54: Chatham County, Randolph County: VTD LB, VTD ST.

District 55: Anson County, Union County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 024, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 027, VTD 033, VTD 036, VTD 043.

District 56: Orange County: VTD CB, VTD CF, VTD CH, VTD CO, VTD DA, VTD DM, VTD EA1, VTD EH, VTD ES, VTD GL, VTD HF, VTD KM, VTD LC, VTD NC, VTD NS, VTD OW, VTD RE, VTD RF, VTD TH, VTD UNC, VTD WD, VTD WDS, VTD WW.

District 57: Guilford County: VTD CG1, VTD CG2, VTD CG3A, VTD CG3B, VTD G07, VTD G08, VTD G09, VTD G10, VTD G20, VTD G21, VTD G22, VTD G23, VTD G24, VTD G25, VTD G26, VTD G27, VTD G28, VTD G29, VTD G30, VTD G31, VTD G40B, VTD NCGR1, VTD NCGR2, VTD SF1, VTD SF2, VTD SF3, VTD SF4.

District 58: Guilford County: VTD FEN1, VTD FR1, VTD FR2, VTD G46, VTD G47, VTD G52, VTD G53, VTD G54, VTD G55, VTD G56, VTD G57, VTD G58, VTD G59, VTD G60, VTD G61, VTD G62, VTD G65, VTD G66, VTD G73, VTD G75, VTD JAM3, VTD SUM1, VTD SUM2, VTD SUM3, VTD SUM4.

District 59: Guilford County: VTD FEN2, VTD G06, VTD GIB, VTD GR, VTD JEF1, VTD JEF2, VTD JEF3, VTD JEF4, VTD MON1, VTD MON2A, VTD MON2B, VTD MON3, VTD NCLAY1, VTD NCLAY2, VTD NMAD, VTD NWASH, VTD PG1, VTD PG2, VTD RC1, VTD RC2, VTD SCLAY, VTD SMAD, VTD SWASH.

District 60: Guilford County: VTD H01, VTD H02, VTD H03, VTD H04, VTD H05, VTD H06, VTD H07, VTD H08, VTD H09, VTD H10, VTD H11, VTD H12, VTD H13, VTD H14, VTD H15, VTD H16, VTD H17, VTD H18, VTD H19A, VTD H19B, VTD H20A, VTD H20B, VTD H22, VTD H26, VTD H28, VTD H29A, VTD JAM1, VTD JAM2, VTD JAM4, VTD JAM5.

District 61: Guilford County: VTD G01, VTD G02, VTD G03, VTD G04, VTD G05, VTD G11, VTD G12, VTD G13, VTD G14, VTD G15, VTD G16, VTD G17, VTD G18, VTD G19, VTD G35, VTD G36, VTD G37, VTD G44, VTD G45, VTD G48, VTD G49, VTD G50, VTD G51, VTD G63, VTD G67, VTD G68, VTD G69, VTD G70, VTD G71, VTD G72, VTD G74.

District 62: Guilford County: VTD FR3, VTD FR4, VTD FR5A, VTD FR5B, VTD G32, VTD G33, VTD G34, VTD G38, VTD G39, VTD G40A1, VTD G40A2, VTD G41A, VTD G41B, VTD G42A, VTD G42B, VTD G43, VTD G64, VTD H21, VTD H23, VTD H24, VTD H25, VTD H27-A, VTD H27-B, VTD H29B, VTD NDRI, VTD OR1, VTD OR2, VTD SDRI, VTD STOK.

District 63: Alamance County: VTD 005, VTD 011, VTD 013, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 06E, VTD 06N, VTD 06S, VTD 06W, VTD 09N, VTD 103, VTD 10N, VTD 10S, VTD 124, VTD 127, VTD 12N.

District 64: Alamance County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 004, VTD 007, VTD 035, VTD 03C, VTD 03N, VTD 03S, VTD 03W, VTD 08N, VTD 08S, VTD 09S, VTD 1210, VTD 125, VTD 126, VTD 128, VTD 129, VTD 12E, VTD 12S, VTD 12W, VTD 3N2.

District 65: Rockingham County.

District 66: Wake County: VTD 01-38, VTD 01-42, VTD 01-44, VTD 01-46, VTD 01-47, VTD 13-01, VTD 13-02, VTD 13-05, VTD 13-06, VTD 13-07, VTD 13-08, VTD 13-09, VTD 17-10, VTD 17-11, VTD 19-17.

District 67: Montgomery County, Stanly County.

District 68: Union County: VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 031, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 17A, VTD 17B, VTD 20A, VTD 20B, VTD 28A, VTD 28B, VTD 28C, VTD 28D.

District 69: Union County: VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 030, VTD 032, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 039, VTD 29A, VTD 29B, VTD 29C, VTD 37A, VTD 37B, VTD 38A, VTD 38B.

District 70: Randolph County: VTD AE, VTD AN, VTD AR, VTD AS, VTD AW, VTD BC, VTD LC, VTD NM, VTD RN, VTD TB, VTD TR, VTD TT.

District 71: Forsyth County: VTD 122, VTD 404, VTD 405, VTD 501, VTD 502, VTD 503, VTD 504, VTD 505, VTD 506, VTD 601, VTD 602, VTD 603, VTD 604, VTD 605, VTD 606, VTD 607, VTD 701, VTD 702, VTD 703, VTD 704, VTD 705, VTD 706, VTD 707, VTD 806.

District 72: Forsyth County: VTD 201, VTD 203, VTD 204, VTD 205, VTD 206, VTD 207, VTD 301, VTD 302, VTD 303, VTD 304, VTD 305, VTD 306, VTD 401, VTD 402, VTD 403, VTD 801, VTD 802, VTD 803, VTD 804, VTD 805, VTD 809, VTD 901, VTD 902, VTD 903, VTD 904, VTD 905, VTD 906, VTD 907.

District 73: Cabarrus County: VTD 01-04, VTD 01-07, VTD 01-08, VTD 01-10, VTD 01-11, VTD 02-03, VTD 02-09, VTD 11-01, VTD 12-04, VTD 12-06, VTD 12-08, VTD 12-09, VTD 12-12, VTD 12-13.

District 74: Forsyth County: VTD 051, VTD 052, VTD 053, VTD 054, VTD 055, VTD 071, VTD 072, VTD 073, VTD 074, VTD 075, VTD 123, VTD 131, VTD 132, VTD 133, VTD 708, VTD 709, VTD 807, VTD 808, VTD 908, VTD 909.

District 75: Forsyth County: VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 042, VTD 043, VTD 061, VTD 062, VTD 063, VTD 064, VTD 065, VTD 066, VTD 067, VTD 068, VTD 082, VTD 083, VTD 507.

District 76: Rowan County: VTD 001, VTD 008, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 015, VTD 018, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 025, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 030, VTD 031, VTD 034, VTD 035, VTD 036, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 040, VTD 041, VTD 042, VTD 045, VTD 14A.

District 77: Davie County, Rowan County: VTD 007, VTD 024, VTD 027, VTD 029, VTD 032; Yadkin County.

District 78: Moore County: VTD BEN, VTD DHR, VTD PHA1, VTD PHA2, VTD PHB1, VTD PHB2, VTD PHC, VTD RBN, VTD SLS, VTD TLT, VTD WEM, VTD WND; Randolph County: VTD DR, VTD GR, VTD PR, VTD RM, VTD SE, VTD SO, VTD SW, VTD UG.

District 79: Beaufort County, Dare County: VTD AVON, VTD BUX, VTD CHCA, VTD COL, VTD EL, VTD FRCO, VTD HAT, VTD KDH: Block(s) 0559703021016, 0559703021022, 0559703021023, 0559703021024, 0559703021025, 0559703021027, 0559703021029, 0559703021030, 0559703021032, 0559703021069, 0559703021070; VTD MATO, VTD MH, VTD NGHD, VTD STPT, VTD WAN; Hyde County, Pamlico County.

District 80: Davidson County: VTD 008, VTD 012, VTD 014, VTD 016, VTD 018, VTD 020, VTD 042, VTD 044, VTD 054, VTD 056, VTD 060, VTD 062, VTD 064, VTD 066, VTD 068, VTD 070, VTD 072, VTD 074, VTD 076, VTD 088, VTD 80A, VTD 86A.

District 81: Davidson County: VTD 004, VTD 006, VTD 010, VTD 022, VTD 024, VTD 026, VTD 028, VTD 030, VTD 032, VTD 034, VTD 036, VTD 038, VTD 040, VTD 046, VTD 048, VTD 050, VTD 052, VTD 058, VTD 078, VTD 082, VTD 084.

District 82: Cabarrus County: VTD 02-01, VTD 02-02, VTD 02-05, VTD 02-06, VTD 02-07, VTD 02-08, VTD 03-00, VTD 04-01, VTD 04-08, VTD 04-09, VTD 04-11, VTD 04-12, VTD 04-13, VTD 12-03, VTD 12-11.

District 83: Cabarrus County: VTD 01-02, VTD 04-03, VTD 05-00, VTD 06-00, VTD 07-00, VTD 08-00, VTD 09-00, VTD 10-00, VTD 11-02, VTD 12-05, VTD 12-10; Rowan County: VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 004, VTD 009, VTD 013, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 033, VTD 044, VTD 05A, VTD 19A.

District 84: Iredell County: VTD BA: Block(s) 0970612013035, 0970612013036, 0970612013037, 0970612013040, 0970612013041, 0970612013048, 0970612013049, 0970612022000, 0970612022001, 0970612022002, 0970612022003, 0970612022004, 0970612022005, 0970612022006, 0970612022013, 0970612022022, 0970612022023, 0970612022024, 0970612022025, 0970612022026, 0970612022027, 0970612022028, 0970612022029, 0970612022030, 0970612022031, 0970612022032, 0970612022033, 0970612022034, 0970612022035, 0970612022036, 0970612022037, 0970612022038, 0970612022039, 0970612022040, 0970612022041, 0970612022042, 0970612022047, 0970612022048, 0970612022049, 0970612022053, 0970612022058, 0970612022059, 0970612023012, 0970612023013, 0970612023022, 0970612023023, 0970612023024, 0970612023025, 0970612023026, 0970612023027, 0970612023028, 0970612023029, 0970612023030, 0970612023031, 0970612023032, 0970612023033, 0970612023034, 0970612023046, 0970612031000, 0970612031001, 0970612031003, 0970612031004, 0970612031014, 0970613011001, 0970613011007, 0970613011020, 0970613011021, 0970613011022, 0970613011023, 0970613011024, 0970613011025, 0970613011028, 0970613011029, 0970613011030, 0970613011031, 0970613011032, 0970613011033, 0970613011034, 0970613011035, 0970613011036, 0970613011037, 0970613012010, 0970613012011, 0970613012012, 0970613012013, 0970613021000, 0970613021001, 0970613021002, 0970613021003, 0970613021004, 0970613021005, 0970613021006, 0970613021007, 0970613021008, 0970613021009, 0970613021010, 0970613021011, 0970613021012, 0970613021013, 0970613021014, 0970613021015, 0970613021016, 0970613021017, 0970613021018, 0970613021019, 0970613021020, 0970613021021, 0970613021022, 0970613021023, 0970613021024, 0970613021025, 0970613021026, 0970613021027, 0970613021028, 0970613021029, 0970613021030, 0970613021036, 0970613021037, 0970613021038, 0970613022002, 0970613022003, 0970613022004, 0970613022005, 0970613022006, 0970613022007, 0970613022008, 0970613022009, 0970613022010, 0970613022011, 0970613022012, 0970613022013, 0970613022014, 0970613022015, 0970613022016, 0970613022017, 0970613023009, 0970613023010, 0970613023011, 0970613023012, 0970613023013, 0970613023014, 0970613023015, 0970613023016, 0970613023017, 0970613023019, 0970613023020, 0970613023021, 0970613023022, 0970613023023, 0970613023024, 0970613023025, 0970613023026, 0970613023027, 0970613023028, 0970613023029, 0970613023030, 0970613023031, 0970613023032, 0970613023033, 0970613023034, 0970613023035, 0970613023036, 0970613023037, 0970613023038, 0970613023039, 0970613023045, 0970613031000, 0970613031001, 0970613031002, 0970613031003, 0970613031015, 0970613031016, 0970613042000, 0970613042002; VTD BE, VTD CD, VTD CH-A, VTD CH-B, VTD CS, VTD EM, VTD NH, VTD OL, VTD SB, VTD SH-A, VTD ST1, VTD ST2, VTD ST3, VTD ST4, VTD ST5, VTD ST6, VTD TB, VTD UG.

District 85: Avery County, McDowell County: VTD CCREEK, VTD FORT-1, VTD FORT-2, VTD HIGGIN, VTD M.COVE, VTD MAR-1, VTD MAR-2, VTD MAR-3, VTD MAR-4, VTD MAR-5, VTD N.COVE, VTD NEBO, VTD PLEASA, VTD T.COVE, VTD WEST-M; Mitchell County, Yancey County.

District 86: Burke County.

District 87: Caldwell County, Watauga County: VTD 004.

District 88: Mecklenburg County: VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 023, VTD 031, VTD 037, VTD 038, VTD 039, VTD 049, VTD 050, VTD 051, VTD 052, VTD 059, VTD 098, VTD 200, VTD 78.1.

District 89: Catawba County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 020, VTD 021, VTD 022, VTD 025, VTD 027, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 034, VTD 040, VTD 041; Iredell County: VTD FT, VTD SH-B.

District 90: Surry County, Wilkes County: VTD 105, VTD 106, VTD 107, VTD 117, VTD 123, VTD 124.

District 91: Forsyth County: VTD 021, VTD 031, VTD 032, VTD 033, VTD 034, VTD 081, VTD 091, VTD 092, VTD 101, VTD 111, VTD 112; Stokes County.

District 92: Mecklenburg County: VTD 077, VTD 122, VTD 138, VTD 147, VTD 225, VTD 228, VTD 229, VTD 230, VTD 243.

District 93: Alleghany County, Ashe County, Watauga County: VTD 001, VTD 002, VTD 003, VTD 005, VTD 006, VTD 007, VTD 008, VTD 009, VTD 010, VTD 011, VTD 012, VTD 013, VTD 014, VTD 015, VTD 016, VTD 017, VTD 018, VTD 019, VTD 020.

District 94: Alexander County, Wilkes County: VTD 101, VTD 102, VTD 103, VTD 104, VTD 108, VTD 109, VTD 111, VTD 112, VTD 113A, VTD 114, VTD 115A, VTD 118, VTD 119, VTD 120, VTD 121, VTD 122, VTD 125, VTD 126, VTD 127, VTD 128, VTD 129.
